Utah statutes.
78B-13-108.   Notice to persons outside state.

(1)  Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is outside this state may be given in a manner prescribed by the law of this state for the service of process or by the law of the state in which the service is made.  Notice shall be given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice, but may be by publication if other means are not effective.

(2)  Proof of service may be made in the manner prescribed by the law of this state or by the law of the state in which the service is made.

(3)  Notice is not required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

